Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Advanced reconductoring” means reconductoring with a  conductor that has a direct
current electrical resistance at least 10 percent lower than existing conductors of a similar
diameter while simultaneously increasing the energy carrying capacity by at least 75 percent
and includes carbon fiber or composite core conductors and superconductors.
(b) “Electric company” means an electric company as defined  in ORS 757.600, that owns
and operates a transmission  system and sells more than 2 million megawatt hours of elec-
tricity in a calendar year.
(c) “Grid enhancing technology” includes  any hardware or software technology that en-
hances the performance or improves performance efficiency of a  transmission system in-
cluding, but not limited to, dynamic line rating,  advanced power flow control technology,
topology optimization, advanced reconductoring,  flexible alternating current transmission
systems or energy storage when used as a transmission resource.
(2) The Legislative Assembly declares that it is the  policy of this state that electric
companies:
(a) Meet the required clean energy targets set forth in ORS 469A.410;
(b) Develop sufficient resources to meet load growth;
(c) Reduce wildfire risk;
(d) Create efficiencies and resilience in the transmission system; and
(e) Maintain energy affordability.
(3) When an electric company files a  resource or grid investment plan with the Public
Utility Commission proposing additions, improvements or modifications to a  transmission
system, the commission shall require the electric  company to conduct an analysis of alter-
natives to determine  the cost-effectiveness and timetable of multiple strategies, including
strategies that use grid enhancing technologies, to:
(a) Increase transmission capacity;
(b) Increase transmission reliability;
(c) Reduce transmission system congestion;
(d) Reduce curtailment of renewable and nonemitting energy resources; and
(e) Increase capacity to connect new renewable and nonemitting energy resources.
Enrolled House Bill 3336 (HB 3336-A) Page 1
(4) An electric company shall file and include as part of the electric  company’s clean
energy plan required under ORS 469A.415, and the electric company’s  integrated resource
plan filed with the commission, a separate section that  provides a strategic plan for using
grid enhancing technologies where doing so is  cost-effective. The electric company shall up-
date the strategic plan concurrently with the development of, or update to,  each integrated
resource plan and make the strategic plan  publicly available. At a minimum, the strategic
plan must:
(a) Include a timeline for deploying grid enhancing  technologies where doing so is cost-
effective;
(b) Report on the electric  company’s continual progress towards implementing the stra-
tegic plan; and
(c) Be designed to:
(A) Increase transmission capacity;
(B) Increase transmission reliability;
(C) Reduce transmission system congestion;
(D) Reduce curtailment of renewable and nonemitting energy resources; and
(E) Increase capacity to connect new renewable and nonemitting energy resources.
(5) For purposes of this  section, the commission shall define “cost-effective” and estab-
lish criteria for determining where using grid enhancing technologies is cost-effective.
SECTION 2.
An electric company’s first strategic plan filed under section 1 (4) of this
2025 Act shall identify both short term actions that can reasonably  be carried out no later
than January 1, 2030, and longer term actions.
SECTION 3. The requirements under section 1 of this  2025 Act apply to an electric
company’s clean energy  plan or integrated resource plan that is filed with the Public Utility
Commission on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 4. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Electric company” means an electric company, as defined in ORS 757.600,  that owns
and operates a transmission  system and sells more than 2 million megawatt hours of elec-
tricity in a calendar year.
(b) “Footprint” means an area that is being actively managed and is  part of a right-of-
way of an existing transmission line.
(c) “Transmission line” means any aboveground or underground electric transmission
lines with a capacity of 57,000 volts  or more, including the utility poles, supports, tunnels,
manholes, vaults, conduits, pipes, wires, conductors,  guys, stubs, platforms, crossarms,
braces, transformers, insulators, cutouts, switches, capacitors,  meters, communication cir-
cuits, appliances, attachments and appurtenances and all  related facilities required for the
acceptance of electric services by the transmission lines.
(2) A  decision on an application for an upgrade to an existing transmission line that is
owned by an electric company shall be made, as provided in this section, by a local govern-
ment with jurisdiction over the transmission line, provided that the upgrade:
(a) Is sited entirely within the existing transmission line’s utility right-of-way or private
easement;
(b) Entails only the deployment, construction  or installation of grid enhancing technolo-
gies, as defined in  section 1 of this 2025 Act, and associated modifications as required to meet
current national electrical safety standards such as the National  Electrical Safety Code, and
not any other type of upgrade, expansion or improvement;
(c) Does not expand the footprint of any part of the transmission lines if sited  within an
area designated for a statewide land use planning goal related to natural resources,  scenic
and historic areas and open spaces or the Willamette River Greenway; and
(d) Does not include:
(A) Adding additional transmission lines or substations; or
Enrolled House Bill 3336 (HB 3336-A) Page 2
(B) Modifications to substations or transformers unless they are within the  footprint of
the original substation or transformer.
(3) A  decision on an application, as provided in this section, including a decision that
determines whether the provisions of subsection (2) of this section apply:
(a) May be subject only to clear and objective standards, conditions and procedures;
(b) May be conditioned upon obtaining any necessary approvals by the  State Department
of Energy or federal government;
(c) Is not a land use decision, as defined in ORS 197.015;
(d) May not be subject to a public hearing; and
(e) May not be appealed except by writ of review under ORS 34.010 to 34.100.
SECTION 5.
Section 4 of this 2025 Act does not apply to  any upgrade to a transmission
line for which an application was filed with a local government on or before the effective date
of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 6. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date  on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by House April 10, 2025
Repassed by House June 16, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 12, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3336 (HB 3336-A) Page 3